Hawaii statutes.
[§342F-18] Enforcement by state and county
authorities. All state and county health authorities and police officers
shall enforce this chapter and the rules and orders of the department. [L 1989,
c 212, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next